Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.173 is amended to read:
343.173. (1) Notwithstanding the limitation  on access to records under ORS 192.311 to 192.478,
326.565, 326.575 and 336.187, the parent is entitled at any reasonable  time to examine all of the re-
cords of the school district pertaining to the  identification, evaluation and educational placement
of the child and the provision of a free appropriate public  education to the child. Records must
be provided without undue delay, which  may not exceed 10 business days, as defined in ORS
192.311, from the date of the request  for the records. Records may be redacted only to the
extent necessary to protect personally identifiable  information of other children unless dis-
closure is authorized by law or court order.
(2) Any parent is entitled to obtain an independent evaluation at the expense of the  school dis-
trict if the parent disagrees with an evaluation obtained by the district.
(3) If the school district disagrees with the parent’s request for  an independent educational
evaluation, the district may initiate  a hearing under ORS 343.165 to show that the district’s evalu-
ation is appropriate. If the final decision is that the district’s evaluation  is appropriate, the parent
has the right to an independent educational evaluation, but not at the district’s expense.
(4) If the parent requests an independent educational  evaluation of the child, the school district
shall provide information about where an independent educational evaluation may be obtained.
(5) If a hearing officer appointed under ORS 343.165 requests an independent educational eval-
uation as part of a hearing, the school district shall pay the cost of the evaluation.
(6) For purposes of this section, “independent educational evaluation” means an evaluation
conducted by a qualified examiner who is not employed by  the school district responsible for the
child in question.
SECTION 2.  ORS 343.165 is amended to read:
343.165. (1)(a) A hearing shall be conducted pursuant to rules of the State Board  of Education
if:
[(a)] (A) The parent requests a  hearing to contest the determination of the school district con-
cerning the identification,  evaluation, individualized education program, educational placement or
the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child; or
[(b)] (B) The school district requests a hearing to obtain a decision regarding whether its  iden-
tification, evaluation, individualized education program  or educational placement of the child is ap-
Enrolled Senate Bill 758 (SB 758-A) Page 1
propriate or whether the district’s proposed action is necessary  to provide the child with a free
appropriate public education.
[(2)] (b) Notwithstanding [ subsection (1)(b) of this section ] paragraph (a)(B)  of this
subsection, a  school district may not request a hearing if a parent refuses or revokes consent for
placement in a program providing special education and related services.
[(3)(a)] (2)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a hearing described in
subsection (1) of this section must be requested within two years  after the date of the act or omis-
sion that gives rise to the right to request a hearing under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The timeline described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not  apply to a parent if the
parent was prevented from requesting the hearing due to:
(A) Specific misrepresentations by the school district that it had resolved the  problem forming
the basis of the complaint; or
(B) The school district withholding from the parent information that the district  was required
to provide under this chapter.
[(4)] (3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that establish when a school  district is
obligated to initiate a contested  case hearing to ensure that a student with a disability is provided
with a free appropriate public education.
[(5) The board’s rules in subsection (1) of this section shall  be as consistent as possible with the
procedures applicable to  a contested case under ORS chapter 183. However, the board’s rules shall
provide that:]
(4) The rules adopted for a hearing as  provided by subsection (1) of this section shall be
as consistent as possible  with the procedures applicable to a contested case under ORS
chapter 183, except that:
(a) The school district is required to provide any evidence without undue delay to:
(A) A parent, if the parent requests the evidence;
(B) The Department of Education, a court or an entity  designated by the department or
court, if the department, court or entity requests the evidence; or
(C) A parent, the department, a  court or an entity designated by the department or court
if the evidence  was provided to the school district’s attorney and is not subject to attorney-
client privilege;
(b) Any evidence provided to a parent, the department, a court or a designated  entity of
the department or court may be redacted only to the extent necessary to  protect personally
identifiable information of other students unless disclosure is  authorized by law or court
order;
[(a)] (c) Any party to a hearing has the  right to prohibit the introduction of any evidence that
has not been disclosed to that party at least five business days before the hearing; and
[(b)] (d) The hearing officer may prohibit the introduction of  any evidence regarding evaluations
and recommendations based on those evaluations that a party intends to use at the hearing,  if the
evidence  has  not been disclosed to the other party at least five business days before the hearing,
unless the other party consents to the introduction of the evidence.
[(6)] (5) Notwithstanding subsection [ (5)] (4) of this section, in an expedited hearing the evidence
must be disclosed to the other party not later than two business days before the hearing.
[(7)] (6) The parent shall be entitled to have the  child who is the subject of the hearing present
at the hearing and to have the hearing open to the public.
[(8)] (7) An expedited hearing shall be held if:
(a) In  a dispute over a disciplinary action for a child with a disability, the child’s parent disa-
grees with a determination that the child’s behavior was not a manifestation of the child’s disability
or with any decision regarding the child’s educational placement; or
(b) The school district believes that maintaining the current placement for the child is substan-
tially likely to result in injury to the child or others.
[(9)] (8) The hearing shall be conducted by an independent hearing officer appointed by  the Su-
perintendent of Public Instruction. The hearing officer:
Enrolled Senate Bill 758 (SB 758-A) Page 2
(a) Shall not be:
(A) An employee of a school district involved in the education or care of the child;
(B) An employee of the Department of Education; or
(C) A person having any  personal or professional interest that would conflict with the person’s
objectivity in the hearing.
(b) Shall possess:
(A) Knowledge of, and the  ability to understand, the provisions of state and federal special ed-
ucation laws, regulations and legal interpretations by federal and state courts;
(B) The knowledge and ability  to conduct hearings in accordance with appropriate standard le-
gal practice; and
(C) The knowledge and ability to render and write  decisions in accordance with standard legal
practice.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 343.165 by section 2 of this 2023 Act apply to com-
plaints made on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 343.
SECTION 5. (1) A school district may not prohibit or discourage a school employee or
school volunteer from:
(a) Participating in good faith in interviews with individuals designated by the Depart-
ment of Education, law enforcement, a court or any other entity involved in the investigation
of a complaint under ORS 343.165;
(b) Making a good faith report of a violation of  state or federal law involving special ed-
ucation and related services;
(c) Sharing information in good faith with the student or the student’s parent about the
services provided or not provided to the student under this chapter;
(d) Reporting in good faith concerns about inappropriate restraint,  seclusion or corporal
punishment of a student to  the student’s parent, the school, law enforcement, a court or
other authorities;
(e) Making a report of suspected abuse or  neglect, including abuse or neglect that hap-
pens at a school, to law enforcement or the Department of Human Services; or
(f) Reporting a suspected violation of the rights  of a child with a disability or the rights
of any other disabled person  within the school district to the state protection and advocacy
system.
(2) A school district  may not require a student, parent, school employee or school vol-
unteer to sign a nondisclosure agreement related to:
(a) Any violations  of law or policy by the school district or by the a school employee or
school volunteer involving special education and related services;
(b) The resolution  of a complaint, including a complaint concerning the services provided
for the student;
(c) Injuries sustained by a student, including injuries  sustained due to the inappropriate
use of seclusion or restraint; or
(d) The death of a student.
(3) A school district may not otherwise cause  a parent or student to believe the school
district will reduce  or revoke services from a student or impose a financial penalty on a
parent or student due to the parent or student’s good  faith public or private disclosure of
information about any settlement or resolution  to a dispute or complaint or about the ex-
perience of the parent or student with the school district.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2023 Act applies to nondisclosure agreements entered into
before, on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act. Any  parts of nondisclosure agreements
inconsistent with the provisions of section 5 of this 2023 Act are void and unenforceable.
SECTION 7.  ORS 343.041 is amended to read:
343.041. (1) Pursuant to rules of  the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public In-
struction shall be responsible for the  general supervision of all special education programs for
Enrolled Senate Bill 758 (SB 758-A) Page 3
children with disabilities, early  childhood special education and early intervention services for pre-
school children with disabilities within the state, including all such  programs administered by any
state agency or common or union high school district or education service district.
(2) All special education programs for children with disabilities, early childhood special educa-
tion and early intervention services for preschool children with disabilities within this state shall
meet the standards and criteria established therefor by the State Board of Education.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule procedures whereby the superintendent
investigates and resolves complaints that the Department of Education, a local education  agency
or an early intervention or early childhood special  education contractor has violated a federal law
or statute that applies to a special education  or early childhood special education program.  Com-
plaint procedures must comply with the provisions of ORS 343.165.
(4) The  State Board of Education shall adopt rules relating to the establishment and mainte-
nance of standards to  ensure that personnel providing special education and early childhood special
education and early intervention services are appropriately and adequately trained.
(5) The Governor shall direct that agencies affected by this section enter into cooperative
agreements to achieve necessary uniformity in meeting the standards and  criteria established by the
state board under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) The Governor shall direct that each public agency obligated under federal or state law  to
provide or pay for any services that are also considered special education or related services  nec-
essary for ensuring a free appropriate public education to children with disabilities,  including but
not limited to the Department of Human Services, enter  into cooperative agreements with the De-
partment of Education concerning:
(a) Allocation among agencies of financial responsibility for providing services;
(b) Conditions, terms and procedures for reimbursement; and
(c) Policies and procedures for coordinating timely and appropriate delivery of services.
(7) All cooperative agreements  entered into under subsections (5) and (6) of this section shall
include procedures for resolving interagency disputes.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 343.167 is amended to read:
343.167. (1) If the finding at the hearing held under ORS 343.165 is that the identification, eval-
uation and educational placement by the district are appropriate and that the child is being provided
a free appropriate public education, the hearing officer shall decide in support  of the determination
of the district.
(2) If the finding at the hearing is that  the identification, evaluation or educational placement
is not appropriate or that the child is not being provided a  free appropriate public education, the
hearing officer shall grant appropriate relief within the hearing officer’s scope of authority.
(3) In matters alleging a procedural violation, a hearing officer  may find that a child did not
receive a free appropriate public education only if the procedural inadequacies:
(a) Impeded the child’s right to a free appropriate public education;
(b) Significantly impeded the parents’ opportunity to participate  in the decision-making process
regarding the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child; or
(c) Caused a deprivation of educational benefits.
(4) Nothing in subsection (3) of this section  shall be construed to preclude a hearing officer from
ordering a school district to comply with procedural requirements.
(5) The decision shall be entered not later than 45 days after  the request for hearing is filed
unless an extension has been granted by the hearing  officer at the request of the parent or the
school district. Copies of the decision  shall be sent to the parent and to the school district accom-
panied by a statement describing the method of appealing the decision.
(6) In expedited hearings conducted pursuant  to ORS 343.165 [ (8)] (7) , the State Board of Edu-
cation shall adopt rules that require a hearing within 20  school days of the date the hearing is re-
quested and a determination within 10 school days after the hearing.
(7) Pursuant to rules of the State Board  of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
shall bill the school district for all reasonable costs  connected with the appointment of an inde-
Enrolled Senate Bill 758 (SB 758-A) Page 4
pendent hearing officer and the conduct of a  due process hearing. The district shall make payment
to the Department of Education for the cost of the hearing within 30 days of receipt of the billing.
SECTION 9.  ORS 343.175 is amended to read:
343.175. (1)  A decision under ORS 343.165 is final unless the parent or the school district files
a civil action under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Either party aggrieved  by the finding and decision of the hearing officer may commence a
civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.
(3) In any action brought under  this section, the court shall receive the records from the ad-
ministrative proceeding, shall hear additional evidence at the request of a  party and, basing its de-
cision on the preponderance of the evidence, shall grant such relief as the court  determines is
appropriate.
(4) Any civil action brought under this section shall be commenced within 90 days of  the date
of the hearing officer’s final order.
(5) In any action or proceeding brought under ORS 343.165 or  in an appeal from any action or
proceeding brought under ORS 343.165, the court, in  its discretion, may award reasonable attorney
fees as part of costs to:
(a) The parents of a child with a disability, if the parents are the prevailing party;
(b) A prevailing party who is the Department  of Education or school district against the attor-
ney of a parent who files a complaint or subsequent cause of  action that is frivolous, unreasonable
or without foundation, or against the attorney of a parent  who continued to litigate after the liti-
gation clearly became frivolous, unreasonable or without foundation; or
(c) A prevailing party who is the Department of Education or a  school district against the at-
torney of a  parent, or against the parent, if the parent’s complaint or subsequent cause of action
was presented for any improper purpose, such as to harass, to cause unnecessary  delay or to need-
lessly increase the cost of litigation.
(6) Attorney  fees awarded under this section shall be based on rates prevailing in the community
in which the action or proceeding arose for  the kind and quality of services furnished. No bonus
or multiplier may be used in calculating these fees.
(7) Attorney fees may not be awarded  and related costs may not be reimbursed under this sec-
tion for services performed after a written offer of settlement to a parent if:
(a) The offer is made within the time  prescribed by Rule 68 of the Federal Rules of Civil Pro-
cedure, or in case of an administrative hearing, more than 10 days before the hearing begins;
(b) The offer is not accepted within 10 days; and
(c) The relief finally obtained by  the parents is not more favorable to the parents than the offer
of settlement.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (7) of this section, attorney fees and  related costs may be
awarded to  a parent who is the prevailing party and who was substantially justified in rejecting the
settlement offer.
(9) Attorney fees  may not be awarded relating to any meeting of the individualized education
program team unless the meeting is convened  as a result of an administrative proceeding under ORS
343.165, or as a result of judicial action. A resolution session is not considered a  meeting convened
as a result of an administrative  hearing or judicial action, or an administrative hearing or judicial
action.
(10) Attorney fees may not be awarded for a mediation that is  conducted before a request for
a hearing under ORS 343.165.
(11) The court shall reduce the amount of attorney fees awarded under this section if:
(a) The parent unreasonably protracted the final resolution of the controversy;
(b) The amount of the attorney fees unreasonably exceeds  the hourly rate prevailing in the
community for similar services  by attorneys of reasonably comparable skill, reputation and experi-
ence;
(c) The time spent and legal services furnished were excessive considering the  nature of the
action or proceeding; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 758 (SB 758-A) Page 5
(d) In requesting a hearing under ORS 343.165 [ (1)(a)] (1)(a)(A) , the attorney  representing the
parent did not provide written notice to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that included:
(A) The child’s name, address and school;
(B) A description of the problem and facts relating to the problem; and
(C) A proposed resolution of the problem.
(12) The court shall not reduce fees under subsection (11) of this section if:
(a) The school district unreasonably protracted the final resolution of the controversy; or
(b) The school district violated the procedural safeguards as set forth in ORS  343.146 to 343.183.
SECTION 10.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 11, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 758 (SB 758-A) Page 6